Hawaii statutes.
[§414-177] Payment of expenses. On
termination of the derivative proceeding the court may:

(1) Order the corporation to pay the plaintiff's
reasonable expenses (including counsel fees) incurred in the proceeding if it
finds that the proceeding has resulted in a substantial benefit to the
corporation;

(2) Order the plaintiff to pay any defendant's
reasonable expenses (including counsel fees) incurred in defending the
proceeding if it finds that the proceeding was commenced or maintained without
reasonable cause or for an improper purpose; or

(3) Order a party to pay an opposing party's
reasonable expenses (including counsel fees) incurred because of the filing of
a pleading, motion, or other paper, if it finds that the pleading, motion, or
other paper was not well-grounded in fact, after reasonable inquiry, or
warranted by existing law or a good faith argument for the extension,
modification, or reversal of existing law and was interposed for an improper
purpose, such as to harass or cause unnecessary delay or needless increase in
the cost of litigation. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next